Illinois, session 104th, HB4320.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 18-233 and by adding Section 18-161 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/18-161 new)7    Sec. 18-161. Taxing district extension limitation. 8    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, beginning 9in taxable year 2027, no taxing district, including a home 10rule unit, may levy a tax on any parcel of real property under 11this Code that is more than 103% of the base amount unless (i) 12the increase is attributable to substantial improvements to 13the property, (ii) the taxing district did not levy a tax 14against the property in the previous taxable year, or (iii) 15the increase is attributable to a special service area. The 16limitation under this Section includes any increase 17attributable to an adjustment under Section 18-233.18    (b) A taxing district may elect to be exempt from the 19provisions of subsection (a) for one or more taxable years if 20the exemption is approved by a referendum held before January 211 of the first taxable year during which the exemption 22applies. Referenda shall be conducted at a regularly scheduled 23election held in accordance with the Election Code. The   HB4320- 2 -LRB104 16726 HLH 30133 b1question shall be presented in substantially the following 2form: 3        "For (taxable years), shall (taxing district) be 4    exempt from the provisions of Section 18-161 of the 5    Property Tax Code, which limits increases in the taxes 6    levied by the taxing against real property to 3% per 7    taxable year?"8    The taxing district may include the following as 9supplemental information on the ballot: 10        "A "yes" vote means that (taxing district) would be 11    allowed to increase the amount of taxes levied against 12    each parcel of property by more than 3%." 13    The votes must be recorded as "Yes" or "No". 14    If a majority of voters voting on the issue approves the 15exemption, then the taxing district shall be exempt from the 16provisions of this Section for the taxable years specified. 17    (c) The changes made to this Section by this amendatory 18Act of the 104th General Assembly are a denial and limitation 19of home rule powers and functions under subsection (g) of 20Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 21    (d) As used in this Section: 22    "Base amount" means the tax levied by the taxing district 23on the subject property in the immediately preceding taxable 24year, except that, if the property received a homestead 25exemption under Article 15 in the immediately preceding 26taxable year and is not eligible for that exemption in the   HB4320- 3 -LRB104 16726 HLH 30133 b1current taxable year, then the base amount shall be the tax 2that would have been levied by the taxing district on the 3subject property in the immediately preceding taxable year if 4the homestead exemption had not been applied. 5    "Taxing district" has the same meaning provided in Section 61-150.  7    (35 ILCS 200/18-233)8    Sec. 18-233. Adjustments for certificates of error, 9certain court orders, or final administrative decisions of the 10Property Tax Appeal Board. Subject to the provisions of 11Section 18-161, beginning Beginning in levy year 2021, a 12taxing district levy shall be increased by a prior year 13adjustment whenever an assessment decrease due to the issuance 14of a certificate of error, a court order issued pursuant to an 15assessment valuation complaint under Section 23-15, or a final 16administrative decision of the Property Tax Appeal Board 17results in a refund from the taxing district of a portion of 18the property tax revenue distributed to the taxing district. 19On or before November 15 of each year, the county treasurer 20shall certify the aggregate refunds paid by a taxing district 21during such 12-month period for purposes of this Section. For 22purposes of the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law, the 23taxing district's most recent aggregate extension base shall 24not include the prior year adjustment authorized under this 25Section. For levy year 2027 and thereafter, an adjustment   HB4320- 4 -LRB104 16726 HLH 30133 b1under this Section, when coupled with all other levy increases 2imposed by the taxing district, may not cause the tax imposed 3by that taxing district on any parcel of real property to 4exceed the limitation set forth in Section 18-161 for that 5taxing district. 6(Source: P.A. 102-519, eff. 8-20-21.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.